Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.516

San Juan Islands license plates.

"San Juan Islands license plates" means license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing the San Juan Islands in Washington state.

[ 2019 c 177 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 177: See note following RCW 46.18.200.